Montana, session 2025, HB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 20-7-712, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-712. Adult basic education fund and its distribution. (1) To encourage adult basic
education, the legislature may appropriate funds to the superintendent of public instruction department of labor
and industry for the support of adult basic education programs in any school district, community college district,
tribal college, public library, community-based organization, or a consortium of those organizations located in
Montana.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction department of labor and industry shall direct the
distribution of funds appropriated by the legislature for adult basic education. The trustees or authorized
representative of any district or tribal college may apply to the superintendent department of labor and industry
for funds for its adult basic education program. The financial administration, accounting, and reporting of adult
basic education funds must conform to policies established by the office of public instruction department of
labor and industry."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 294